District of Columbia statutes.
2-1211.05

Commission report.

The commission shall complete its work and submit its report with recommendations to the Council no later than 12 months following the first meeting of the commission. Upon filing its report, all authority for the commission shall expire.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-171, § 6, 33 DCR 7205
July 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-137, § 2, 35 DCR 4262
1981 Ed., § 1-2255.